Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 2. Services, Rates, Charges, etc.
§ 56-235.8.
Retail supply choice for natural gas customers.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, each public utility authorized to furnish natural gas service in Virginia (gas utility) is authorized to offer to all of the gas utility’s customers not eligible for transportation service under tariffs
in effect on the effective date of this section, direct access to gas suppliers (retail supply choice) by filing a plan for implementing retail supply choice with the State Corporation Commission for approval. The provisions of
this section shall not apply to any retail supply choice pilot program in effect on July 1, 1999. The Commission shall accept such a plan for filing within thirty days of filing if it contains, at a minimum:

A schedule for implementing retail supply choice for all of its customers;

Tariff revisions, including proposed unbundled rates for firm and interruptible service (which may utilize a cost allocation and rate design formulated to recover the gas utility’s nongas fixed costs on a nonvolumetric basis) and terms and conditions
of service designed to provide nondiscriminatory open access over its transportation system, comparable to the transportation service provided by the gas utility to itself, to allow competitive suppliers to sell natural
gas directly to the gas utility’s customers. Any proposed unbundling rates shall include an explanation of the methodology used to develop the rates and a calculation of revenues, by customer class, thereby produced;

Nonbypassable, competitively neutral annual surcharges for the gas utility to properly allocate and recover from its firm service customers not eligible for nonpilot transportation service under tariffs in effect on the effective date of this section,
its nonmitigable costs associated with the provision of retail supply choice, including prudently incurred contract obligation costs and transition costs. For the purposes of this section, contract obligation costs are
costs associated with acquiring, maintaining or terminating interstate and intrastate pipeline and storage capacity contracts, less revenues generated by mitigating such contract obligations, whether by off-system sales,
capacity release, pipeline supplier refunds or otherwise; and transition costs are costs incurred by the gas utility associated with educating the public on retail supply choice and redesigning its facilities, operations
and systems to permit retail supply choice;

Tariff provisions to balance the receipts and deliveries of gas supplies to retail supply choice customers and allocate the gas utility’s gas costs so that one class of customers is not subsidized by another class of customers;

Tariff provisions requiring the gas utility, at a minimum, to offer gas suppliers or retail supply choice customers the right to acquire the gas utility’s upstream transmission and/or storage capacity in a manner that assures that one class of customers
is not subsidized by another class of customers, provided that nothing contained herein shall deny the gas utility the right to request Commission approval of such tariff provisions as are designed to ensure the safe and
reliable delivery of natural gas to firm service customers on its system, including provisions requiring gas suppliers to accept assignment of upstream transportation and storage capacity, and/or allowing the gas utility
to retain a portion of its upstream transportation and storage capacity to ensure safe and reliable natural gas service to its customers;

A code of conduct governing the activities and relationships between the gas utility and gas suppliers to prevent anticompetitive or discriminatory conduct and the unlawful exercise of market power. Such codes of conduct shall incorporate or be consistent
with any rule or guideline established by the Commission; and

Any other requirement established by Commission rule or regulation.The Commission may, by rule or regulation, impose such additional filing requirements as it deems necessary in the public interest. The Commission may also require a gas utility to continue
to serve as a gas supplier to its customers after the gas utility’s plan becomes effective and under such terms and conditions as are necessary to protect the public interest.

After the Commission has accepted a filing as provided in subsection A, the Commission shall review and approve a plan filed by a gas utility unless it determines, after notice and an opportunity for public hearing, that the plan would:

Adversely affect the quality, safety, or reliability of natural gas service by the gas utility or the provision of adequate service to the gas utility’s customers;

Result in rates charged by the gas utility that are not just and reasonable rates within the contemplation of § 56-235.2 or that are in excess of levels approved by the Commission under § 56-235.6, as the case may be;

Adversely affect the gas utility’s customers not participating in the retail supply choice plan;

Unreasonably discriminate against one class of the gas utility’s customers in favor of another class (provided, however, that a gas utility’s recovery of nongas fixed costs on a nonvolumetric basis shall not necessarily constitute unreasonable discrimination);
or

Not be in the public interest.The Commission shall, after the acceptance of a filing of a retail supply choice plan, approve or disapprove the plan within 120 days. The 120-day period may be extended by Commission order for an additional period not to
exceed sixty days. The retail supply choice plan shall be deemed approved if the Commission fails to act within 120 days or any extended period ordered by the Commission. The Commission shall approve a retail supply choice
plan filed by a gas utility pursuant to this subsection regardless of whether it has promulgated rules and regulations pursuant to subsection A. The Commission may also modify a plan filed by a gas utility to ensure that
it conforms to the provisions of this subsection and is otherwise in the public interest. Plans approved pursuant to this section shall not be placed into effect before July 1, 2000.

The Commission may, on its own motion, direct a gas utility to file a retail supply choice plan, which shall comply with subsection A, shall include such other details in the plan as the Commission may require, and does not cause the effects set forth
in subsection B, or the Commission may, on its own motion, propose a plan for a gas utility for retail supply choice that complies with the requirements of subsection A and does not cause the effects set forth in subsection B.
The Commission may approve any plans under this subsection after notice to all affected parties and an opportunity for hearing.

Once a plan becomes effective pursuant to this section, if the Commission determines, after notice and opportunity for hearing, that the plan is causing, or is reasonably likely to cause, the effects set forth in subsection B, it may order revisions to
the plan to remove such effects. Any such revisions to the plan will operate prospectively only.

If, upon application of at least twenty-five percent of retail supply choice customers or of 500 retail choice customers, whichever number is lesser, or by the gas utility, it is alleged that the marketplace for retail supply choice customer is not reasonably
competitive or results in rates unreasonably in excess of what would otherwise be charged by the gas utility, or if the Commission renders such a determination upon its own motion, then the Commission may, after notice, and opportunity
for hearing, terminate the gas utility’s retail supply choice program and provide for an orderly return of the retail choice customers to the gas utility’s traditional retail natural gas sales service. In such event, the gas utility
shall be given the opportunity to acquire, under reasonable and competitive terms and conditions and within a reasonable time period, such upstream transportation and storage capacity as is necessary for it to provide traditional
retail natural gas sales service to former retail supply choice customers.

Licensure of gas suppliers.

No person, other than a gas utility, shall engage in the business of selling natural gas to the residential and small commercial customers of a gas utility that has an approved plan implementing retail supply choice unless such person (for the purpose
of this section, gas supplier) holds a license issued by the Commission. An application for a gas supplier license must be made to the Commission in writing, be verified by oath or affirmation and be in such form and contain
such information as the Commission may, by rule or regulation, require. For purposes of this subsection, the Commission shall require a gas supplier to demonstrate that it has the means to provide natural gas to essential
human needs customers. A gas supplier license shall be issued to any qualified applicant within forty-five days of the date of filing such application, authorizing in whole or in part the service covered by the application,
unless the Commission determines otherwise for good cause shown. A person holding such a license shall not be considered a “public service corporation,” “public service company” or a “public utility” and shall not be subject
to regulation as such; however, nothing contained herein shall be construed to affect the liability of such a person for any license tax levied pursuant to Article 2 (§

58.1-2620

et seq.) of Chapter 26 of Title 58.1. No license issued under this chapter shall be transferred without prior Commission approval finding that such transfer is not inconsistent with the public interest.
If the Commission determines, after notice and opportunity for public hearing, that a gas supplier has failed to comply with the provisions of this subsection or the Commission’s rules, regulations or orders, the Commission
may enjoin, fine, or punish any such failure pursuant to the Commission’s authority under this statute and under Title 12.1 of the Code of Virginia. The Commission may also suspend or revoke the gas supplier’s license or
take such other action as is necessary to protect the public interest.

The Commission shall establish rules and regulations for the implementation of this subsection, provided that:

The Commission’s rules and regulations shall not govern the rates charged by licensed gas suppliers, except that the Commission’s rules and regulations may govern the terms and conditions of service of licensed gas suppliers to protect the gas utility’s
customers from commercially unreasonable terms and conditions; and

The Commission’s rules and regulations shall permit an affiliate of the gas utility to be licensed as a gas supplier and to participate in the gas utility’s retail supply choice program under the same terms and conditions as gas suppliers not affiliated
with the gas utility.

Retail customers’ private right of action; marketing practices.

No gas supplier shall use any deception, fraud, false pretense, misrepresentation, or any deceptive or unfair practices in providing or marketing gas service.

Any person who suffers loss (i) as the result of fraudulent marketing practices, including telemarketing practices, engaged in by any gas supplier providing any service made competitive under this section, or of any violation of rules and regulations
issued by the Commission pursuant to subdivision F 3, or (ii) as the result of any violation of subdivision 1 of this subsection, shall be entitled to initiate an action to recover actual damages, or $500, whichever is
greater. If the trier of fact finds that the violation was willful, it may increase damages to an amount not exceeding three times the actual damages sustained, or $1,000, whichever is greater. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of law to the contrary, in addition to any damages awarded, such person also may be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs.

The Attorney General, the attorney for the Commonwealth or the attorney for the city, county or town may cause an action to be brought in the appropriate circuit court for relief of violations referenced in subdivision 2 of this subsection.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, in addition to any damages awarded, such person or governmental agency initiating an action pursuant to this section may be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs.

Any action pursuant to this subsection shall be commenced by persons other than the Commission within two years after its accrual. The cause of action shall accrue as provided in §

8.01-230

. However, if the Commission initiates proceedings, or any other governmental agency files suit for violations under this section, the time during which such proceeding or governmental suit and all appeals
therefrom are pending shall not be counted as any part of the period within which an action under this section shall be brought.

The circuit court may make such additional orders or decrees as may be necessary to restore to any identifiable person any money or property, real, personal, or mixed, tangible or intangible, which may have been acquired from such person by means of any
act or practice violative of this subsection, provided that such person shall be identified by order of the court within 180 days from the date of any order permanently enjoining the unlawful act or practice.

In any case arising under this subsection, no liability shall be imposed upon any gas supplier who shows by a preponderance of the evidence that (i) the act or practice alleged to be in violation of subdivision 1 of this subsection was an act or practice
over which the same had no control or (ii) the alleged violation resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adopted to avoid a violation. However, nothing in this section shall
prevent the court from ordering restitution and payment of reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs pursuant to subdivision 4 of this subsection to individuals aggrieved as a result of an unintentional violation of this
subsection.

Authorized public utilities shall file with the Commission tariff revisions reflecting the net effect of the elimination of taxes pursuant to subsection B of §

58.1-2904

and the addition of state income taxes pursuant to §

58.1-400

. Such tariffs shall be effective for service rendered on and after January 1, 2001, and shall be filed at least forty-five days prior to the effective date. Such filing shall not constitute a rate increase for the
purposes of § 56-235.4.

Consumer education.

The Commission shall develop a consumer education program designed to provide the following information to retail customers concerning retail supply choice for natural gas customers:

Opportunities and options in choosing natural gas suppliers;

Marketing and billing information gas suppliers will be required to furnish retail customers;

Retail customers’ rights and obligations concerning the purchase of natural gas and related services; and

Such other information as the Commission may deem necessary and appropriate and in the public interest.

3.
The Commission shall also have the authority to issue rules and regulations governing the marketing practices of gas suppliers.

2.
The consumer education program authorized herein may be conducted in conjunction with the program provided for in § 56-592.

3.
The Commission shall establish or maintain a complaint bureau for the purpose of receiving, reviewing and investigating complaints by retail customers against gas utilities, public service companies, licensed suppliers and
other providers of any services affected by this section. Upon the request of any interested person or the Attorney General, or upon its own motion, the Commission shall be authorized to inquire into possible violations of § 56-235.8
and to enjoin or punish any violations thereof pursuant to its authority under § 56-235.8, this title, or Title 12.1. The Attorney General shall have a right to participate in such proceedings consistent with the Commission’s Rules
of Practice and Procedure.

4.
For all billing statements sent on and after August 1, 2000, all gas utilities, as defined in subsection A, shall enclose the following information in all billing statements for retail natural gas service:

a. Gas utilities shall separately state an approximate amount of the tax imposed under §§

58.1-2626

,

58.1-2660

and

58.1-3731

which is included in the customer’s bill until such tax is no longer imposed; and

b.
For all such billing statements, a statement which reads as follows shall be included: “Beginning January 1, 2001, the current state and local gross receipts taxes on sales of natural gas will be replaced by a tax based
on the consumption of natural gas by consumers. In the past, the current gross receipts tax has always been included in the rate charged for natural gas. Now, this tax is being separately stated. The total gross receipts tax imposed
by Virginia and the localities is approximately two percent of the amount charged to consumers. The new state and local consumption tax will be charged at an approximate rate of $0.02 per 100 cubic feet (CCF) of natural gas consumed.
While this rate was designed to be less than, or equal to, the effect of the current gross receipts tax which is being replaced, the tax you pay may actually be higher in your locality. This statement is being provided for your information.”

History.
1999, c. 494; 2000, cc. 691, 706.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1999, c. 494, cl. 2, provides: “That the Senate Committee on Finance, the House Finance Committee, the Senate Committee on Local Government, and the House Committee on Counties, Cities and Towns shall conduct a joint study of the taxation of gas
utilities and natural gas suppliers. In conducting this study, the committees shall seek assistance from (i) representatives of gas utilities, natural gas suppliers, industrial gas customers, and electric cooperatives, (ii) organizations
representing localities, (iii) the Virginia State Corporation Commission, and (iv) the Department of Taxation. In formulating their findings and recommendations, the committees shall consider and assess the effect of state and local
taxation of gas utilities and natural gas suppliers on the economic development goals and objectives of the Commonwealth. Furthermore, the committees shall formulate and recommend specific statutory language to ensure (i) revenue neutrality
for the Commonwealth and its local governments and (ii) that any revisions to the existing regime of local and state taxation of gas utilities and natural gas suppliers do not increase the tax rate applicable to, or tax burdens borne
by, gas utilities, natural gas suppliers and gas customers, as of the date of enactment of this legislation. The committees shall submit a report of their findings and recommendations to the General Assembly not later than December
15, 1999.”

Acts 1999, c. 494, cl. 3, had provided that the provisions of the act would expire July 1, 2000. However, Acts 2000, cc. 691 and 706, cl. 3, repealed this provision.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 691 and 706 are identical, and substituted “the gas utility’s” for “its” in the first sentence of subsection A; rewrote the first sentence in subdivision A 3, which formerly read: “A nonbypassable, competitively neutral mechanism
for the gas utility to recover from its customers its nonmitigable costs prudently incurred to support its merchant obligation and to facilitate retail supply choice, including reasonable contract obligation costs and transition costs,”
substituted “by mitigating” for “with mitigating” in the second sentence of subdivision A 3; in subdivision A 4, substituted “one class of customers is” for “the retail supply choice customers are,” and substituted “another class of”
for “nonretail choice”; added the language following “storage capacity” through the end of the paragraph in subdivision A 5; inserted “After the Commission has accepted a filing as provided in subsection A,” at the beginning of the
introductory paragraph in subsection B; inserted “quality” in subdivision B 1; added subdivision B 5; added the first three sentences at the beginning of the first undesignated paragraph in subsection B; added present subsection C,
redesignated former subsections C through F as present subsections D through G; substituted “finding that such transfer is” for “as being” in the sixth sentence of present subsection F, added the language beginning “enjoin” through
the end of the present seventh sentence of present subsection F, rewrote the eighth present sentence in present subsection F; in present subdivision G 2, inserted “fraudulent” and substituted “subdivision F 3” for “subdivision E” in
clause (i), and in clause (ii), substituted “subdivision 1 of this subsection” for “subdivision F”; in present subdivision F 3, substituted “subdivision 2 of this subsection” for “subdivision F”; in present subdivision F 5, substituted
“subsection” for “section” near the beginning of the first sentence, and inserted “by persons other than the Commission” in the first sentence; substituted “this subsection” for “subsection F” in subdivision G 6; and added subsection
H.

Law Review.

For article on developments in the field of Virginia public utility law from June 2002 through May 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 195 (2003).

§ 56-235.9.
Recovery of funds used for capital projects prior to a rate case for strategic natural gas facilities.

As used in this section:“Capitalized carrying cost” includes the return on the investment, depreciation, and tax.“Natural gas transmission company” means any investor-owned public service company engaged in the business of transporting natural gas to
more than one electric utility, natural gas utility, or non-jurisdictional customer.“Natural gas utility” means any investor-owned public service company engaged in the business of furnishing natural gas service to the public.“Strategic
natural gas facility” includes, without limitation, a natural gas distribution or transmission pipeline, storage facility, compressor station, liquefied natural gas facility, peaking facility or other appurtenant facility, used
to furnish natural gas service in the Commonwealth that, for a natural gas utility with fewer than 150,000 customers, adds stand-alone design day deliverability or designed send-out of at least 10,000 dekaTherms per day or two
or more such facilities, regardless of size, that add design day deliverability or designed send out of at least 75,000 dekaTherms per day in the aggregate, and for a natural gas utility with 150,000 or more customers, adds stand-alone
design day deliverability or designed send out of at least 20,000 dekaTherms per day or two or more such facilities, regardless of size, that add design day deliverability or designed send out of at least 100,000 dekaTherms per
day in the aggregate, and for a natural gas transmission company, adds design day deliverability or designed send out of at least 100,000 dekaTherms per day in the aggregate.

Any natural gas utility that places a strategic natural gas facility into service on or after July 1, 2008, or natural gas transmission company that places a strategic natural gas facility into service on or after July 1, 2014, to serve its customers
shall have the right to recover through its rates charged to those customers the entire prudently incurred costs of the facility including: planning, development and construction costs; costs of infrastructure associated therewith;
an allowance for funds used during construction; and the capitalized carrying cost from the time construction is completed and the asset is placed into service until the time that the Commission establishes new rates that include
recovery of all costs as defined herein. Such recovery shall be permitted by allowing such costs to be recorded in the utility’s plant accounts and included in rate base for purposes of cost recovery (i) in new rate schedules for
service not offered under existing rate schedules or new rate schedules for expansion of existing services as permitted by § 56-235.4, (ii) in a rate case using the cost of service methodology set forth in § 56-235.2, or (iii)
in a performance-based regulation plan authorized by § 56-235.6, subject to Commission determination that such costs were prudently incurred. The allowance for funds used during construction and the return on investment shall be
calculated utilizing the weighted average cost of capital, including the cost of debt and cost of equity used in determining the natural gas utility’s base rates in effect during the construction period of the strategic natural
gas facility.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the Commission from granting similar treatment to other natural gas facilities when the Commission deems such treatment to be in the public interest.

History.
2008, c. 867; 2014, cc. 467, 507.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 467 and 507 are identical, and in subsection A, added the definition of “Natural gas transmission company,” and in the definition of “Strategic natural gas facility” inserted “and for a natural gas transmission company, adds
design day deliverability or designed send out of at least 100,000 dekaTherms per day in the aggregate”; and in subsection B, inserted “or natural gas transmission company that places a strategic natural gas facility into service on
or after July 1, 2014.”

§ 56-235.10.
Recovery of eligible safety activity costs; administration; procedure.

As used in this section:“Eligible safety activity costs” means a natural gas utility’s operation and maintenance expenditures that are related to (i) the development, implementation, or execution of the natural gas utility’s integrity management program
developed in conformance with 49 CFR Part 192, Subpart P — Gas Distribution Pipeline Integrity Management or (ii) programs or measures implemented to comply with regulations issued by the Commission or a federal regulatory body
with jurisdiction over pipeline safety.“Natural gas utility” means any investor-owned public service company engaged in the business of furnishing natural gas service to the public.

In order to enhance pipeline safety in the Commonwealth, when the requirements of this section have been satisfied, a natural gas utility shall be permitted to recover eligible safety activity costs incurred on and after January 1, 2013, in future rates
as provided in this section. The natural gas utility shall maintain the burden of demonstrating that the eligible safety activity costs have been reasonably and prudently incurred and that the criteria of this section have been
satisfied.

A natural gas utility may account for eligible safety activity costs to be recovered pursuant to this section as deferred costs. The accumulated unrecovered balance of eligible safety activity costs deferred pursuant to this section shall not exceed four
percent of the natural gas utility’s net plant investment that was utilized in establishing or confirming base rates in the natural gas utility’s most recent rate case using the cost of service methodology set forth in § 56-235.2
or performance-based regulation plan authorized by § 56-235.6. The eligible safety activity costs deferred hereunder shall be included in new base rates and charges instituted pursuant to a Commission order establishing or confirming
customer rates in a rate case using the cost of service methodology set forth in § 56-235.2 or a performance-based regulation plan authorized by § 56-235.6. Such deferred costs shall not be subject to write-off or write-down by
the Commission in an earnings test filing made pursuant to Commission rules governing utility rate increases and annual informational filings except as provided in this subsection. The natural gas utility shall be deemed to have
recovered eligible safety activity costs to the extent that the return on equity earned by the natural gas utility in an earnings test filing for a given year, after consideration of the treatment of regulatory assets, is in excess
of the mid-point of the rate of return on equity range specified or confirmed in the natural gas utility’s most recent rate case or performance-based regulation plan. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event that a utility’s
base rates include eligible safety activity costs, the utility shall only be permitted to defer the level of eligible safety activity costs that are in excess of the level reflected in base rates.

Any natural gas utility that has on its books eligible safety activity costs deferred pursuant to this section shall include an earnings test filing as part of any application for an annual informational filing or rate proceeding.

History.
2013, cc. 281, 406.

§ 56-235.11.
Retail rates of affiliated water utilities.

As used in this section, unless the context requires a different meaning:“Affiliate” of a specific water utility or a water utility “affiliated” with a specific water utility means a water utility that directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries
controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the water utility specified.“Control,” including the terms “controlling,” “controlled by,” and “under common control with,” means direct or indirect possession of the
power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a water utility through the ownership of an equity interest. Control shall be presumed to exist with respect to another water utility if any water utility
directly or indirectly owns, controls, or holds with the power to vote 50 percent or more of the equity interest of the other water utility.“Rates” includes rates, tolls, charges, or schedules.“Subsidiary” of a specified water
utility means an affiliate directly or indirectly controlled by that water utility through one or more intermediaries.“Water utility” means an investor-owned public utility authorized to furnish water or water and sewer service
within a certificated service territory in the Commonwealth except any such investor-owned public utility for which the Commission has approved, after July 1, 2009, and prior to July 1, 2017, a consolidated rate structure consisting
of three or more rate groups for the same class of service and in one or more subsequent orders has approved additional consolidation of such rate groups.“Water utility network” means a water utility and all other water utilities
that the water utility is an affiliate of, is affiliated with, controls, is controlled by, is under common control with, or is a subsidiary of. “Water utility network” also means, with respect to a water utility that is authorized
to furnish water or water and sewer service within multiple certificated service territories in the Commonwealth, all of the certificated service territories that the water utility is certificated to serve.

In any proceeding commenced on and after July 1, 2017, to establish or approve the rates of a water utility that is in a water utility network, the Commission shall ensure that the rates of each water utility in the water utility network are not unjustly
discriminatory by ensuring that equal fixed and volumetric rates are charged for each customer class of each water utility that is in the water utility network.

Upon the commencement of a proceeding described in subsection B, the Commission shall make each water utility that is a member of the applicable water utility network a party to the proceeding and may review each member water utility’s rates. In such
proceeding:

The Commission shall review the rates of each member of the applicable water utility network and order gradual adjustments to such water utility’s rates over an appropriate period in order to implement the provisions of subsection B; and

The Commission is authorized to aggregate the revenues and costs of the water utilities that are members of the applicable water utility network.

History.
2017, c. 822.

§ 56-235.12.
Economic development programs.

As used in this section:“Acquire utility rights-of-way” means the planning, surveying, permitting, and acquisition of land, including options, easements, and other estates in land.“Costs” includes depreciation, taxes, return on investment, and other land-related
costs associated with costs incurred to acquire utility rights-of-way pursuant to a Program.“Economic Development Program” or “Program” means a program under which a utility is authorized by the Commission under this section to
acquire utility rights-of-way for one or more qualified economic development sites.“Partnership” means the Virginia Economic Development Partnership Authority.“Qualified economic development site” means an industrial site within
the Commonwealth that has been certified by the Partnership pursuant to subsection B.“Utility” means a public utility providing water, sewer, electric, or natural gas service to retail customers in the Commonwealth.

The Partnership is authorized to certify that an industrial site is a qualified economic development site if it finds that:

The person with legal authority to develop the site is authorized to contract for the extension of utility service to the site;

The development of the site is compliant with applicable zoning requirements and is consistent with the locality’s comprehensive plan;

Applicable environmental surveys and reviews, including any wetlands survey, geotechnical borings, a topographical survey, a cultural resources review, an Endangered Species review, or a Phase 1 Environmental Assessment, if required, are completed;

An estimate of the costs of the development of the site has been prepared and provided to the Partnership; and

The acquisition of utility rights-of-way for the site will further the creation of new jobs and capital investment in the Commonwealth by facilitating the location of one or more significant economic development projects in the Commonwealth.

A utility proposing an Economic Development Program shall file a proposal with the Commission for review. A proposal for approval of a Program shall include an analysis of how acquiring utility rights-of-way will enhance the Commonwealth’s infrastructure
and promote the Commonwealth’s competitive business environment by improving the readiness of a qualified economic development site.

The Commission shall approve, or approve with appropriate modifications, a Program if it finds that:

The implementation of the Program will provide material economic development benefits that might not otherwise be attained absent the Commission’s approval of the Program;

The Program proposes a rate mechanism, including base rates or a rate adjustment clause, that authorizes the utility to recover its costs incurred in implementing the Program until such time as the investment is placed in service;

The proposal to acquire utility rights-of-way would not otherwise be immediately supported by expected revenues from new loads served under the Program at the qualified economic development site;

The utility’s capital investment does not exceed one percent of gross plant investment in the aggregate or $5 million for any specific qualified economic development site;

The associated charges resulting from implementation of the Program will apply only to firm service customers;

The Virginia Economic Development Partnership has certified pursuant to subsection B that the site for which the utility proposes to acquire utility rights-of-way under the Program is a qualified economic development site;

The Program is designed only to acquire utility rights-of-way to a qualified economic development site and not to provide service to other customers or potential customers;

The utility’s assumptions regarding costs to acquire utility rights-of-way under the Program are not unduly speculative; and

The Program is not otherwise contrary to the public interest.

After Commission review and absent action by the Commission to the contrary, the Program shall take effect 120 days following the date on which the proposal for the Program was filed. Any amendment to a Program following its implementation shall be submitted
to the Commission at least 60 days prior to the proposed effective date thereof and, absent action by the Commission to the contrary, the amendment shall become effective on such date.

The Commission’s approval of a Program shall authorize the utility to:

Acquire utility rights-of-way for the ordinary extension of utility facilities in the normal course of business to one or more qualified economic development sites; and

Recover costs incurred in implementing the Program, including costs deferred and associated carrying costs, from the time incurred until the time the Commission establishes new rates that include recovery of such deferred costs.

A utility, in implementing a Program, shall in good faith coordinate the acquisition of rights-of-way with communications providers and other utilities, including water, sewer, electric, or natural gas utilities, so that any facilities ultimately to be
constructed may be collocated to the extent feasible.

In calculating the utility’s return on the investment with regard to costs incurred in implementing a Program, the Commission shall use the utility’s regulatory capital structure, including the cost of equity most recently approved by the Commission.
If the utility’s cost of capital at the time its Economic Development Program is filed has not been changed by order of the Commission within the preceding five years, the Commission may require the utility to file an updated weighted
average cost of capital, and the utility may propose an updated weighted average cost of capital.

Nothing in this section shall:

Be deemed to prevent one or more utilities from jointly filing a Program under this section, and the Commission may consolidate consideration of Programs filed to serve the same qualified economic development site;

Otherwise impair or enlarge the powers granted to public service companies by this title;

Permit a Program to include conversion of existing retail propane customers to electric or natural gas; or

Prohibit an electric utility from recovering its transmission-related costs incurred in implementing the Program through a rate adjustment clause pursuant to subdivision A 4 of § 56-585.1.

A utility may request proprietary treatment of any and all supporting materials provided in support of a Program.

History.
2019, cc. 494, 495.